South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3494.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 39, Title 15 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 15-39-160. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, so long as any portion of this State is under a gubernatorial state of emergency, no judicial proceeding or judicial sale may be held to foreclose on real property. SECTION 2.  Chapter 51, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-51-180. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, so long as any portion of this State is under a gubernatorial state of emergency, the provisions of this chapter may not be utilized to foreclose on real property. SECTION 3.  The repeal or amendment by this act of any law, whether temporary or permanent or civil or criminal, does not affect pending actions, rights, duties, or liabilities founded thereon, or alter, discharge, release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred under the repealed or amended law, unless the repealed or amended provision shall so expressly provide. After the effective date of this act, all laws repealed or amended by this act must be taken and treated as remaining in full force and effect for the purpose of sustaining any pending or vested right, civil action, special proceeding, criminal prosecution, or appeal existing as of the effective date of this act, and for the enforcement of rights, duties, penalties, forfeitures, and liabilities as they stood under the repealed or amended laws. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----